Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3609
Legislative
findings.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) That it is a benefit to the state and in the best interest
of the citizens of Nebraska to deliver economic and community development
services in an integrated and coordinated system through increased community,
state, and federal cooperation and collaboration;

(2) That the Partnership for Rural Nebraska is recognized
as a strategic partnership between the State of Nebraska, the University of
Nebraska, and the United States Department of Agriculture, the purpose of
which is to provide a formal structure of organizational collaboration and
delivery of rural economic and community development resources and programs
to Nebraska's rural communities;

(3) That the Partnership for Rural Nebraska has earned national
recognition as a model for cooperative and collaborative delivery of services;
and

(4) That it encourages the continued participation of the
State of Nebraska, through the Department of Economic Development and
the University of Nebraska, in the Partnership for Rural Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 1053, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 48, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 21.